Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-408
Public safety agency, defined.

Public safety agency means any federal, state, or political subdivision entity which provides emergency and public safety services, including medical services, law enforcement services, fire management services, correctional services, and emergency and disaster relief services.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 213.